Massachusetts, session 194th, H282.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 51D of Chapter 111 is hereby amended by striking lines 82 to 84,
inclusive, and inserting thereof the following:-
(6) scheduled follow-up medical appointments or verification that such information was
provided separately;
(7) descriptions of any pharmaceutical, rehabilitative, or life-supporting technology,
machinery, or equipment required to maintain medical stability, together with instructions for
maintenance and upkeep of said technology; and
(8) such other information as the department may require.
of 3

SECTION 2. Said section 51D is hereby further amended by adding, after the word
“services” in line 154, the following:-
Prior to the release of a client of the department from acute, chronic, or long-term care
from a hospital, the hospital shall communicate the discharge plan and provisions for aftercare
services to registered nurse or licensed practical nurse employed at the patient’s residence or, in
the case of a client with intellectual or developmental disabilities, residential facility. In the case
of a client with intellectual or developmental disabilities, prior to the release of a client from a
hospital, a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse who receives a discharge plan must review
the discharge plan with particular adherence to requirements to maintain life-supporting
technology, machinery, or equipment used in the client’s residence or residential facility, as well
as any individualized education program or individualized service plan that exists under the
client’s name, and must sign in writing to acknowledge a full understanding of the requirements
of the discharge plan and knowledge of any individualized education program or individualized
service plan. The registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall advise any residential facility
personnel, family members, and personal care attendants on the requirements of the discharge
plan, as well as any hospital recommendations, to ensure constant protection and safety of the
client.
SECTION 3. The department of public health shall develop guidelines and regulations as
necessary to implement the provisions of this Act. The department of public health shall conduct
any necessary public awareness campaigns necessary to publicize the provisions of this Act and
to ensure that families of clients, hospitals, and medical facilities are aware of their respective
rights and responsibilities under this Act. The department shall post on its website guidance,
of 3

regulations, and any other informational materials that may assist clients’ families, hospitals, and
medical facilities in the implementation of and compliance with this Act.
SECTION 4. This act shall go into effect immediately upon its passage.
of 3